Missouri, session 2026, SB1763.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, and program described herein for the item or items stated, and
for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period beginning
July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the unexpended balances available as of June 30,
2026, but not to exceed the amounts stated herein, as follows:

Section 17.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at the Special Acres School for the Severely Disabled
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.005, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.005, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,593,046

Section 17.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at the Autumn Hill State School

SB 1763 2
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.007, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.010, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$2,023,372

Section 17.015. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than seventy-one
thousand but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants for
equipment purchases and upgrades in technical programs
located in any city with more than seventy-one thousand but
fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants, provided that no
local match is required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.147, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.015, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,269,938

Section 17.020. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
for equipment, design, renovation, construction, and
improvements of a career and technical school located in any
city with more than thirty-six thousand five hundred but fewer
than forty thousand inhabitants, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.149, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.020, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session

SB 1763 3
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $220,166

Section 17.025. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a statewide education organization whose directors consist entirely
of public school board members for a center located in any city
with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer
than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants to provide
experience-based realistic training for school safety officials,
educators and first responders that is focused on prevention,
preparedness, response, and recovery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.096, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.030, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,063,694

Section 17.030. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of College and Career Readiness
For the Vocational-Technical Education Enhancement Grant award
program, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.165, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,000,000

Section 17.035. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For a school district located in any city with more than sixteen
thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than thirty-five thousand
but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants for equipment, design,
renovation, construction, improvements, and program
expansions of a career and technical school, that host nine
regional high schools, located in any city with more than sixteen

SB 1763 4
thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than thirty-five thousand
but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.172, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

Section 17.045. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For building renovations for a not-for-profit organization early
childhood center located in a county with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-one thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2, Section 2.361, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168)...........$4,000,000

Section 17.050. To the University of Missouri
For the design and construction of a new veterinary laboratory,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local match rate in order to be eligible for state funds
pursuant to Section 173.480, RSMo
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.170, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.040, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $889,925

Section 17.055. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the design, planning, and construction, to include equipment and
lab space, of a manufacturing innovation center in a city not
within a county, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis

SB 1763 5
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.260, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.050, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$14,329,042

Section 17.060. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri Fischer Delta Research, Extension and
Education Center, for the continuation of the construction for
the soil laboratory and maintenance on existing structures,
provided that no local match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.262, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.060, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,708,639

Section 17.065. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri Fischer Delta Research, Extension and
Education Center, for the construction, maintenance, repairs,
improvements, upgrades and maintenance on existing
structures, to the greenhouse and farm buildings, provided that
no local match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.263, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.065, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 17.070. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Mineral Area Community College

SB 1763 6
For a veterinary technician program, provided that no local match be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.040, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.070, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $215,500

Section 17.075. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri
For the planning, design, and construction of the Radioisotope Science
Center at the University of Missouri Research Reactor (MURR)
on the Columbia campus
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.005, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$50,000,000

Section 17.085. To Southeast Missouri State University,
For a non-profit organization that enable all young people to reach their
full potential as productive, caring and responsible citizens, for
a building located in any city with more than three thousand
four hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than twenty-five
thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3, Section 3.415, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

Section 17.090. To Truman State University,
For the Greenwood Interprofessional Autism Center

SB 1763 7
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3, Section 3.430, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $575,000


Section 17.095. To the Department of Transportation
For the maintenance and repair of minor and low volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.307, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.075, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$4,646,447


Section 17.100. To the Department of Transportation
For improvements, renovations, maintenance and repair at an airport
located in any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than seventeen thousand but fewer than twenty-one
thousand inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.321, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.080, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $762,600

Section 17.105. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing three
lanes in each direction on I-70 to be funded from state road
bond proceeds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.428, an Act of the 102nd

SB 1763 8
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.701, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From State Road Fund I-70 Project Bond Proceeds Fund (1323)........... $1,117,649,508

Section 17.110. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing three
lanes in each direction on I-70 pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.429, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.702, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From State Road Fund I-70 Project Fund (1324)........................ $1,373,813,346

Section 17.115. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing on I-44
from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route
160 to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route
249 and rebuild pavement and improve the I-44/Route 13
interchange and the I-44/I-49 interchange and other I-44 Tier 2
and Tier 3 projects listed on the Unfunded Needs List, to be
funded from state road bond proceeds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.433, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.703, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From State Road I44 Improvement Bond Proceeds (1337)..................$363,750,000

Section 17.120. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, designing,
constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating and repairing on I-44

SB 1763 9
from Missouri Route T to Missouri Route 68, from US Route
160 to Missouri Route 125, and from I-49 to Missouri Route
249 and rebuild pavement and improve the I-44/Route 13
interchange and the I-44/I-49 interchange and other I-44 Tier 2
and Tier 3 projects listed on the Unfunded Needs List pursuant
to a financing agreement between the Commission and the
Office of Administration
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.434, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.704, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From State Road I44 Improvement (1338). .............................$213,441,925


Section 17.125. To the Department of Transportation
For a transportation cost-share program with local communities,
provided that these funds shall not supplant, and shall only
supplement, the current planned allocation of road and bridge
expenditures under the most recently adopted state
transportation and improvement plan, including all amendments
thereto, as of the date of passage of this bill by the General
Assembly, and provided that the Department of Transportation
and the Department of Economic Development work
cooperatively to select projects with the greatest economic
benefit to the State
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.445, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.706, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$55,919,465


Section 17.130. To the Department of Transportation
For an environmental impact study related to improvements to the
Interstate 44 corridor

SB 1763 10
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.446, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.707, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$8,956,605

Section 17.135. To the Department of Transportation
For distribution to a county with more than two hundred thousand but
fewer than two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, for the
planning, design, and construction of a bridge and
improvements to the two roads connected by said bridge, as
well as other intersection improvements related to an economic
development project, provided that no local matching funds
shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.447, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.708, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$8,868,192

Section 17.140. To the Department of Transportation
For an engineering study and work on Highway BB bridge over
Interstate 35 in a city with more than eight thousand but fewer
than nine thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county
with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-two
thousand inhabitants and improving the exit and entrance ramps
for said intersection and route BB east of said intersection
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.455, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.711, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $779,920


SB 1763 11
Section 17.145. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, right of way acquisition, utility improvements
and relocation, upgrades and construction of U.S. Highway 67
in any county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.712, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$58,526,774
From State Road Fund (1320). ..................................... 90,000,000
Total............................................................$148,526,774

Section 17.150. To the Department of Transportation
For the maintenance, repair and upgrades to LeCompte Road, located
in any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but
fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that no
local match be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.713, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$3,400,000

Section 17.155. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing and constructing of an interchange and
outer services road improvements in the Interstate 70 corridor in
any county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than
forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than eight thousand but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section

SB 1763 12

17.714, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$34,446,664

Section 17.160. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an intersection and road
improvements on US Highway 65 and Missouri Route B in any
county with more than forty-two thousand but fewer than forty-
four thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-two thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.716, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,700,000

Section 17.165. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an interchange and road
improvements on I-49 and US Highway 58 in any county with
more than one hundred five thousand but fewer than one
hundred ten thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.717, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$19,859,941

Section 17.170. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, designing, construction and improvements of U.S.
Highway 63 in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants

SB 1763 13

Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.718, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,096,218

Section 17.175. To the Department of Transportation
For planning, designing, acquisition, and construction of additional
passing lanes on U.S. Highway 65 between any city with more
than three thousand but fewer than three thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants
and any city with more than two thousand one hundred fifty but
fewer than two thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in
a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand but fewer than two thousand two
hundred twenty inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.456, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.719, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$37,880,083

Section 17.180. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For the maintenance and repair of low-volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.460, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section

SB 1763 14
17.721, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$9,487,581

Section 17.185. To the Department of Transportation
For protection of the public against hazards existing at railroad
crossings pursuant to Chapter 389, RSMo
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.540, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.723, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$24,140,548

Section 17.190. To the Department of Transportation
For a city with more than six thousand three hundred but fewer than
seven thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than two hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty
thousand inhabitants for an additional two trains to stop at a
train station per day, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.531, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.724, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 17.195. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seventy
thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, including
land acquisition, pursuant to the provisions of the State Block
Grant Program administered through the Federal Airport
Improvement Program and the Infrastructure Investment and
Jobs Act

SB 1763 15
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.726, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$8,367,812

Section 17.200. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and improvements of an airport in a city with
more than thirty-six thousand five hundred but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds
shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.727, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)................................... $350,000


Section 17.205. To the Department of Transportation
For the construction of a commercial terminal facility at a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer than
seven thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.505, an Act of the 99th
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.728, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,998,337

Section 17.210. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, and construction of an aircraft maintenance
facility at a joint-use military and civilian airport located in a

SB 1763 16
county with more than eighty thousand but fewer than one
hundred thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local matching funds shall be
required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.729, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$7,500,000

Section 17.215. To the Department of Transportation
For the relocation of the fuel farm facility at joint-use military and
civilian airport located in a county with more than eighty
thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants, provided that no local
matching funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.731, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$2,000,000

Section 17.220. To the Department of Transportation
For the construction and improvements of an airport terminal in any
county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than
thirty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than fourteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.535, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section

SB 1763 17
17.732, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,199,773

Section 17.225. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a municipal
airport located in a city with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty-one thousand inhabitants partially located in a county
with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty
thousand inhabitants, including land acquisition, pursuant to the
provisions of the State Block Grant Program administered
through the Federal Airport Improvement Program and the
Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.733, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)..........................$3,400,000

Section 17.230. To the Department of Transportation
For construction, capital improvements, or planning of a joint-use
military and civilian airport located in a county with more than
eighty thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seventy
thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, including
land acquisition, pursuant to the provisions of the State Block
Grant Program administered through the Federal Airport
Improvement Program and the Infrastructure Investment and
Jobs Act
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.550, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.734, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Multimodal Operations Federal Fund (1126)..........................$8,800,000

Section 17.235. To the Department of Transportation

SB 1763 18
For a grant to a port authority located in any county with more than two
hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants, for assistance in port planning, acquisition, or
construction within the port district
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.555, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.736, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$4,478,240

Section 17.240. To the Department of Transportation
For improvements to a port located in a county with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than five thousand
five hundred but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants,
provided that no local matching funds shall be required
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.551, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.738, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,667,149

Section 17.250. To the Department of Transportation
For the Maintenance Program
For the maintenance and repair of low-volume routes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.495, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$19,976,128

Section 17.260. To the Department of Transportation
For the Aviation Program
For an advanced weather system for an airport in a county with more
than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand

SB 1763 19
but fewer than three thousand eight hundred inhabitants and
owned by a city with more than nine thousand but fewer than
ten thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.600, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $600,000

Section 17.265. To the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For distribution to a public transit provider serving a city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county for a program to accommodate the need for
expanded public transit services related to hosting the 2026
World Cup
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 4, Section 4.536, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 17.270. To the Office of Administration
For repairs and renovations to the south lawn fountain located on the
Capitol Complex
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.250, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.090, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$1,097,913

Section 17.275. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and refurbishment of the Capitol building plumbing
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.270, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.095, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session

SB 1763 20
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$3,916,642

Section 17.280. To the Office of Administration
For the repair and restoration of the bronze doors located in the Capitol
building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.130, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.120, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202)........................................................ $190,705

Section 17.285. To the Office of Administration
For capital improvements to support the largest and most prestigious
single-sport event host city to a non-profit performing arts
center that delivers accessible live entertainment for all
audiences, superior theatre arts education, impactful outreach
programs and events that utilize the venue, and helps sustain
community engagement programming that impacts nearly
twenty-five thousand locals each year and to a private non-
profit organization that connects all people to each other and the
natural world to promote understanding, appreciation and
conservation, located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that appropriations shall be matched on a 50/50 basis
by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 5, Section 5.236, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.115, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $610,407

Section 17.290. To the Office of Administration
For planning, design, construction, renovation, acquisition, upgrades,
redevelopment, and unprogrammed funding for state-owned
properties statewide

SB 1763 21
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.005, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.130, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124)..........................$5,000,000
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970)............................. 1,353,943
Total
$6,353,943

Section 17.295. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the State Fair
For planning, design, construction, renovation, land acquisition, and
upgrades of facilities at the State Fair
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.015, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.145, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$7,552,677

Section 17.300. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design and construction of a meat laboratory facility
that will be used for training, education, technical support, and
research on a land grant university located in any city with more
than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.022, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.150, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$17,794,389

Section 17.305. To the Department of Agriculture

SB 1763 22
For the planning, design, construction, and renovation of a Veterinary
Medical Diagnostic Laboratory on a land grant university
located in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants,
provided that such building shall be named in honor of Doctor
Dan Brown
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.081, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.155, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$38,437,676

Section 17.310. To the Department of Agriculture
For the planning, design and construction of a meat laboratory facility
that will be used for training, education, technical support, and
research on a land grant university located in any city with more
than one hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one
hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.022, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.160, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$10,000,000

Section 17.315. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Missouri State Fair
For planning, design, construction, renovation, land acquisition, and
upgrades of a livestock support barn and a stalling barn at the
Missouri State Fair
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.010, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From State Fair Bond Proceeds Fund (1336)..............................$55,000,000

SB 1763 23

Section 17.320. To the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For planning, design, and construction of a soybean cyst nematode
laboratory facility that will be used for training, education,
technical support, and research on a land grant university
located in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants,
and provided that a match be provided
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.024, an Act of the
103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,000,000

Section 17.325. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance,
repairs, replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.005, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.175, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal and Other (1140)............... $350,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ............................... 1,011,743
Total
$1,361,743

Section 17.330. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Big Lake State Park, provided one hundred percent

SB 1763 24
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.010, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.180, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $820,986

Section 17.335. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Cuivre River State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.015, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.185, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$1,664,167

Section 17.340. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Current River State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.020, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.190, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$8,571,800

Section 17.345. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks

SB 1763 25
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Dr. Edmund A. Babler State Park, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections
17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.025, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.195, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$3,078,597

Section 17.350. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Echo Bluff State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.030, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.200, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). ........... $36,993

Section 17.355. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Finger Lakes State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.035, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.205, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$1,375,463

SB 1763 26

Section 17.360. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Harry S Truman State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.040, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.210, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $871,698

Section 17.365. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Lake of the Ozarks State Park, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections
17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.050, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.220, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $600,009

Section 17.370. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Lewis and Clark State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.055, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section

SB 1763 27
17.225, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$1,132,943

Section 17.375. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Long Branch State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.060, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.230, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$2,208,293

Section 17.380. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Montauk State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.065, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.235, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$1,150,053

Section 17.385. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Onondaga Cave State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.070, an Act of the 101st

SB 1763 28
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.240, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). ............ $2,850

Section 17.390. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at St. Francois State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.080, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.250, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$3,878,261

Section 17.395. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Stockton State Park, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.085, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.255, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $624,927

Section 17.400. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Table Rock State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425

SB 1763 29
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.090, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.260, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$3,976,599

Section 17.405. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Thousand Hills State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.095, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.265, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $871,698

Section 17.410. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Trail of Tears State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.100, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.270, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $790,135

Section 17.415. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Wakonda State Park, provided one hundred percent

SB 1763 30
(100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330 through
17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.105, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.275, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$1,639,625

Section 17.420. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Watkins Woolen Mill State Park, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections
17.330 through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.110, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.280, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .........$3,733,248

Section 17.425. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Weston Bend State Park, provided one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between sections 17.330
through 17.425
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.115, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.285, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Board of Public Buildings Bond Proceeds Series A 2021 (1311). .......... $761,009

Section 17.430. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks

SB 1763 31
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance,
repairs, replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.300, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal and Other (1140)..............$7,999,939
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ...................................3,167,047
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)................................... 2,542,163
Total
$13,709,149

Section 17.435. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Nathan and Olive Boone Homestead Historic Site
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.025, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.305, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ................................... $151,498

Section 17.440. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Bryant Creek State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.040, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most

SB 1763 32
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.320, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ................................ $452,719


Section 17.445. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Big Oak Tree State Park Boardwalk
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.045, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.325, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ............................. $392,747


Section 17.450. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Pelster House Barn
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.050, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.330, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430). ......................... $268,373

Section 17.455. To the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repair, and other improvements to state-owned
historic properties and other state-owned historical assets in
Missouri connected to African American history and culture in
Missouri
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.053, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,

SB 1763 33
Section 17.335, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)......................................$1,571,356

Section 17.460. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance,
repairs, replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.170, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.350, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal and Other (1140)..............$7,594,068
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ...................................5,244,069
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)................................... 1,679,610
Total
$14,517,747


Section 17.465. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Route 66 State Park Historic Bridge
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.175, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 2017,
Section 17.355, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ............................$6,000,000


SB 1763 34

Section 17.470. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at the Shepherd of the Hills State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.180, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.360, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ..................................$2,567,592

Section 17.475. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at Big Lake State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.185, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.365, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ................................... $896,958

Section 17.480. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twelve
thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand
inhabitants, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation be matched on a 75/25 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.340, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$29,175,065


SB 1763 35
For water infrastructure improvements and projects for any city with
more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.237, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.340, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 373,633
Total.............................................................$34,548,698

Section 17.485. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure improvements and projects located in any city
with more than seven hundred sixty but fewer than eight
hundred fifty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more
than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with fewer than three hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.345, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,885,290

For the maintenance, repair, and capital improvements for sewer
updates located in any village with more than eighteen but
fewer than twenty-six inhabitants and located in a county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twelve
thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section

SB 1763 36
17.345, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 15,000

For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements for a sewer project located in a city with more
than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants
and that is the county seat of a county with more than thirty-five
thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants, provided
that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation be
matched on a 90/10 basis by the recipient
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.238, an Act of the 102nd
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.345, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 3,142,658
Total..............................................................$6,042,948

Section 17.490. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance,
repairs, replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.010, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.375, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)......................................$9,414,256

Section 17.495. To the Department of Natural Resources

SB 1763 37
For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements for a sewer project located in a city with more
than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand
nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
sixty thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.380, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

For the planning, design, maintenance, construction, repair, or capital
improvements of a sewer project in a city with more than one
thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand
three hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more
than sixty thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.380, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 797,980
or a water infrastructure project located in city with more than one
thousand one hundred seventy but fewer than one thousand
three hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.380, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 50,000


SB 1763 38

For drinking water and sewer infrastructure improvements in any city
with more than one thousand three hundred but fewer than one
thousand five hundred inhabitants and partially located in a
county with more than eight thousand but fewer than eight
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than three hundred but fewer than six hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.237, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.380, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)................................. 730,079
Total..............................................................$2,078,059

Section 17.505. To the Department of Natural Resources
For a flood protection improvement project located in city with more
than seven hundred sixty but fewer than eight hundred fifty-five
inhabitants and located in a county with more than seven
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with fewer than four hundred eighty inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.303, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.390, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Flood Resiliency Improvement (1238)................................ $800,000

For a flood resiliency project in any county with more than five
thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than nine hundred but fewer than one
thousand six hundred inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.303, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,

SB 1763 39
Section 17.390, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Flood Resiliency Improvement (1238)............................ 40,253
Total............................................................... $840,253

Section 17.510. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the construction of a dump station located in Van Meter State Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.352, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.395, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)....................................... $500,000

For the construction of a public restroom located in Roaring River State
Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.352, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.395, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)................................... 125,000
Total............................................................... $625,000

Section 17.515. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.235, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.396, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602). ................$237,321,836
From The Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649). .................... 200,956,985
Total............................................................$438,278,821

Section 17.520. To the Department of Natural Resources

SB 1763 40
For water infrastructure grants and loans, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between other funds
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2006, Section 6.235, an Act of the
103rd General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Water and Wastewater Loan Revolving Fund (1602). ................$431,187,420
From The Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649). .................... 260,291,005
Total............................................................$691,478,425

Section 17.525. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance,
repairs, replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.015, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal and Other (1140)..............$8,000,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). ...................................2,250,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)................................... 3,000,000
Total.............................................................$13,250,000

Section 17.530. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the construction, installation, and maintenance of a flood wall and
lift pump for a city with more than one hundred eighty-five but
fewer than two hundred ten inhabitants and located in a county
with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two
hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.234, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $400,000

SB 1763 41

Section 17.535. To the Department of Natural Resources
For sewer infrastructure improvements for a nursing facility located in
any city with more than six hundred eighty but fewer than seven
hundred sixty inhabitants and located in a county with more
than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than four hundred but fewer than
one thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.236, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 17.540. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy
For the Missouri University of Science and Technology for a small
modular nuclear reactor science and development program
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.343, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Department of Natural Resources Federal and Other (1140)..............$3,000,000

Section 17.545. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy to commission a distributed energy
resources study, which shall include a value of solar study along
with the practical and economic benefits, challenges, and
drawbacks of increased distributed energy generation in the
state, and which shall also include legislative and regulatory
recommendations related thereto to the Governor, the Public
Service Commission, and the General Assembly
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.342, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Energy Futures Fund (1935)........................................ $500,000

Section 17.550. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of Energy
For energy generation infrastructure for a performing arts and
entertainment complex in a city with more than fifty-one

SB 1763 42
thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 6, Section 6.341, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $250,000

Section 17.555. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition
and development; financial assistance to other public agencies
or in partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement
on department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
100th General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.400, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ............................. $200,000

Section 17.560. To the Department of Conservation
For major improvements and repairs (including materials, supplies, and
labor) to buildings, roads, hatcheries, signage, and other
departmental structures; and for soil conservation activities,
erosion control, and land improvement on department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.055, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.405, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ............................$3,000,000

Section 17.565. To the Department of Conservation

SB 1763 43
For stormwater and flooding repairs at George O. White State Forest
Nursery and Little River Conservation Area
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3020, Section 20.350, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.410, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ............................$2,000,000

Section 17.570. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition
and development; financial assistance to other public agencies
or in partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement
on department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.190, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.415, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ............................$1,700,000

Section 17.575. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition
and development; financial assistance to other public agencies
or in partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement
on department land

SB 1763 44
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.015, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.420, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ...........................$16,000,000

Section 17.580. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition
and development; financial assistance to other public agencies
or in partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement
on department land
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.020, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ...........................$20,000,000

Section 17.595. To the Department of Economic Development
For the Missouri Housing Development Commission
For the general administration of affordable housing activities and
emergency aid
For housing subsidy grants or loans
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.030, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Missouri Housing Trust Fund (1254)...............................$25,000,000

Section 17.605. To the Department of Economic Development
For distribution to any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand
but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants for the
planning, design, property acquisition, construction, renovation,
maintenance, and repair of a regional convention center

SB 1763 45
complex, provided that local matching funds must be provided
on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 7, Section 7.020, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$30,000,000

Section 17.610. To the Department of Economic Development
For a non-profit organization located in any city with more than fifty-
eight thousand but fewer than sixty-four thousand inhabitants
that is organized exclusively for charitable, religious,
educational, and scientific purposes
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2007, Section 7.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.446, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,698,732

Section 17.615. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance,
repair, and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
Troop A Pre-Trip Building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.035, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............. $800,000

Section 17.620. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance,
repair, and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
Troop E Crime Lab
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.040, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session

SB 1763 46
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)............$12,749,490

Section 17.625. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For construction and improvements to a jail located in any county with
more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four hundred
but fewer than one thousand inhabitants provided that local
matching funds must be provided on a 75/25 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 8, Section 8.006, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

For construction and improvements to a regional law enforcement
center located in any county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 8, Section 8.006, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)................................. 2,000,000
Total
$3,000,000

Section 17.630. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the planning, design, maintenance, and construction of a training
facility for law enforcement in a city with more than eighty-five
thousand but fewer than ninety-five thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 8, Section 8.131, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,000,000

Section 17.635. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety

SB 1763 47
For construction of a new columbarium wall, pre placed crypts, and
infrastructure upgrades throughout the cemetery grounds at
Springfield Veterans Cemetery
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.200, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.465, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)...........$6,067,581

Section 17.640. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.030, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.480, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190).................................. $3,333

Section 17.645. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of an addition to the aircraft maintenance
facility at AVCRAD Base in Springfield and design and
construction of a readiness center and maintenance hangar at
AVCRAD Base in Springfield
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.035, an Act of the 100th
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.485, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190).............................$101,791,753

Section 17.650. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide

SB 1763 48
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.025, an Act of the
100th General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.490, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)................................ $662,808

Section 17.655. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.130, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.495, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)................................ $670,067

Section 17.660. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of an elevator at the Ike Skelton Training
Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.135, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section
17.500, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................... $74,414

Section 17.665. To the Department of the National Guard
For capital improvements and maintenance and repair to a joint civilian
and military owned and operated airport located in a city with
more than seventy-one thousand but fewer than seventy-nine
thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.395, an Act of the 101st
General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most recently
authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17, Section

SB 1763 49
17.505, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First Regular
Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $963,075

Section 17.670. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.060, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.510, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)...............................$2,134,182

Section 17.675. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design, land acquisition, and construction of the Bellefontaine
Neighbors Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.065, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.515, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)..............................$15,763,361
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .............................. 5,994,911
Total
$21,758,272

Section 17.680. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction at the Albany Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.075, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.520, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $871,940

SB 1763 50

Section 17.685. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.205, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.525, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)...........................$29,996,157


Section 17.690. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design, land acquisition, and construction of the Bellefontaine
Neighbors Readiness Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.210, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.530, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,743,376
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)............................ 15,000,000
Total.............................................................$18,743,376


Section 17.695. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For land acquisition, renovation, and repairs at Jefferson Barracks
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.535, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,988,227

For the design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide

SB 1763 51
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.535, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)...............................29,982,672

For the renovation, construction, and upgrades to the Rosecrans Air
National Guard Base
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2019, Section 19.020, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.535, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)............................ 28,600,000
Total.............................................................$62,570,899

Section 17.700. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.045, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)..............................$35,000,000

Section 17.710. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new community supervisory center in the southwest region of
Missouri
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.220, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.540, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$10,160,393

SB 1763 52

Section 17.715. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of
facilities at the Fulton Reception and Diagnostic Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.225, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.545, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$13,435,217

Section 17.720. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design and construction of an inpatient children’s
acute psychiatric hospital located at a residential treatment
facility in a county with more than one million inhabitants
operated by a non profit entity that currently operates or is part
of a health system that operates acute/inpatient children’s
psychiatric hospitals and psychiatric residential treatment
facilities with extensive experience in trauma informed care and
adapting the latest neuroscience to treatment, offering youth full
medical, psychiatric, clinical, and educational services,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.530, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.570, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$6,352,148

Section 17.725. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the construction of a 200-bed mental health hospital in conjunction
with a non-state governmental acute care hospital operating
inpatient behavioral health beds in a state-owned facility

SB 1763 53
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.099, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.555, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Federal Earnings Fund (1558). ..................................$135,000,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................86,828,600
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148).................. 29,994,532
Total............................................................$251,823,132

Section 17.730. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design, construction, expansion, and operation of a
behavioral health facility of a hospital founded in 1958 and
located in any city with more than four thousand four hundred
but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants and
located in a county with more than two hundred thirty thousand
but fewer than two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2010, Section 10.093, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.572, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)..................................$9,460,019


Section 17.735. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For safety and security upgrades at the Southeast Missouri Mental
Health Center
Expense and Equipment
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2010, Section 10.315, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.573, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148)...............$2,332,312

SB 1763 54


Section 17.740. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For a non-profit organization focused on veteran’s healthcare
headquartered in any city not within a county, working in
collaboration with an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance
Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, for the
renovation of facilities to expand access to mental health and
employment training for veterans with opioid use disorder and
co-occurring substance use disorders
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.115, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................. $250,000

Section 17.745. To the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design, construction, expansion, and operation of a
children’s behavioral health hospital and outpatient treatment
center of a hospital founded in 1879, and located in any city
with more than twenty-three thousand but fewer than twenty-
seven thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more
than one million inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.096, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$7,500,000

Section 17.750. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Developmental Disabilities
For an Autism Center headquartered in a city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must be
provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.410, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 17.755. To the Department of Mental Health

SB 1763 55
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For repair and renovation of an organization that provides transitional
living and supportive housing for individuals in recovery from
alcohol and drugs, located in any county with more than fifty
thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than seventeen thousand but fewer than
twenty-one thousand inhabitants, and located in any county with
more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than twenty-one
thousand but fewer than thirty-one thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.126, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................. $980,000

Section 17.760. To the Department of Mental Health
For an Outpatient Comprehensive Substance Treatment and
Rehabilitation (CSTAR) Provider, located in any city not within
a county, with at least twenty years of experience and currently
in the process of renovating clinics, to meet increasing
substance use needs in the community through clinic and
recovery housing renovations and expanded telehealth access
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.095, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................. $750,000

Section 17.765. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the construction of a 200-bed mental health hospital in conjunction
with a non-state governmental acute care hospital operating
inpatient behavioral health beds in a state-owned facility
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.050, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Federal Earnings Fund (1558). ...................................$48,159,575

Section 17.770. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the Division of Community and Public Health

SB 1763 56
For the refurbishment of existing administration buildings for the
purpose of creating a 166 physician residency program located
in any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but
fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 10, Section 10.765, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,625,000

Section 17.775. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction at the W.E. Sears Youth
Center
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.080, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.575, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,076,174

Section 17.780. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction at the Camp Avery Park
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 3019, Section 19.085, an Act of the
101st General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.580, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,754,322

Section 17.785. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new youth center in the St. Louis region
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 19, Section 19.230, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, First Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,

SB 1763 57
Section 17.585, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$7,119,138

Section 17.790. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For safety renovations and general operating expenses to a nonprofit
organization established in 1911 that enhances independence,
empowers individuals, and enriches the lives of people who are
visually impaired or blind located in a city not within a county
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.191, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.605 an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $32,443

Section 17.795. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit community organization founded in 1976 and
located in city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county to purchase a
building for their core operations and make any necessary
renovations
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 2011, Section 11.249, an Act of the
102nd General Assembly, Second Regular Session, and most
recently authorized under the provisions of House Bill 17,
Section 17.625, an Act of the 103rd General Assembly, First
Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

Section 17.800. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For capital improvements at a nonprofit community center that
promotes youth development, healthy and active living, and
community responsibility located in a city with more than
sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants

SB 1763 58
and that is the county seat of a county with more than twenty-
five thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.258, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,300,000

Section 17.805. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization founded in 2017 to open a cooperatively
owned grocery store that will provide locally grown, fresh
produce from state farmers, and other locally sourced products
and meats located in any county with more than one million
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.292, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $250,000

Section 17.810. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For a Child Assessment Center in a county with more than two hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand
inhabitants
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 11, Section 11.491, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $932,614

Section 17.825. To the Office of Administration
For the Supreme Court
For planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
improvements to the Supreme Court building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of Senate Bill 1, Section 1.055, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Extraordinary Session of the First
Regular Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202).......................................................$2,168,112


SB 1763 59
Section 17.830. To the Missouri State Capitol Commission
For renovation and repair of restrooms in the capitol building, as well
as repair and renovations to mechanical, electrical, and
plumbing systems in the capitol building
Representing expenditures originally authorized under the
provisions of House Bill 12, Section 12.535, an Act of the 103rd
General Assembly, First Regular Session
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202).......................................................$4,000,000
(cid:252)